src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
! TODO
! primary verbs (end in a consonant)
LEXICON VerbSuffix-Cons
    @U.Perf.NoPrefix@+V:@U.Perf.NoPrefix@ VerbTense-Cons ;
    +V: VerbTensePerf ;
LEXICON VerbTense-Cons
    +Past:{N}e          VerbSubject ;
    +Pres:{E}           VerbSubject ;
    +Pres+Prog:{^}a     VerbSubject ;
    +Fut:uva            VerbSubject ;


! derived verbs (end in -a)
LEXICON VerbSuffix-A
    @U.Perf.NoPrefix@+V:@U.Perf.NoPrefix@ VerbTense-A ;
    +V: VerbTensePerf ;
LEXICON VerbTense-A
    +Past:ane           VerbSubject ;  ! TODO: some might lose their "derived" ending
    +Pres:a             VerbSubject ;
    +Pres+Prog:{^}ea    VerbSubject ;
    +Fut:uva            VerbSubject ;


! derived verbs (end in -ya)
LEXICON VerbSuffix-YA
    @U.Perf.NoPrefix@+V:@U.Perf.NoPrefix@ VerbTense-YA ;
    +V: VerbTensePerf ;
LEXICON VerbTense-YA
    +Past:yane          VerbSubject ;  ! TODO: some might lose their "derived" ending
    +Pres:ya            VerbSubject ;
    +Pres+Prog:y{^}ea   VerbSubject ;
    +Fut:yuva           VerbSubject ;


LEXICON VerbTensePerf
    +Past+Perf:{^}ie    VerbTensePerfEnd ;
LEXICON VerbTensePerfEnd  ! add the "sketchy" tag iff Tense == PerfNoPrefix
    @U.Perf.NoPrefix@+Err/-Norm:@U.Perf.NoPrefix@ VerbSubject ;
    @U.Perf.YesPrefix@ VerbSubject ;


! subject agreement or attached pronouns

LEXICON VerbSubject
    ! attached pronouns
    +Sing+1:n       # ;
    +Sing+1:nye     # ;
    +Sing+2:t       # ;
    +Sing+2:cce     # ;
    +Sing+2:tye     # ;  ! TODO add a tag to say this is sketchy
    +Sing+3:s       # ;
    +Sing+3:rye     # ;  ! TODO add a tag to say this is sketchy
    +Dual+1+In:lwe  # ;  ! TODO add a tag to say this is sketchy
    +Plur+1+Ex:mme  # ;
    +Plur+1+In:lme  # ;
    +Plur+2:lye     # ;
    +Plur+2:l       # ;
    +Plur+3:nte     # ;
    ! simple number agreement
    +Sing:  # ;
    +Plur:r # ;

! TODO: add object pronouns
